Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-5] Cooperation between courts.
(a) In a guardianship or protective proceeding in the State of Hawaii, the
court may request the appropriate court of another state to do any of the
following:

(1) Hold an evidentiary hearing;

(2) Order a person in the other state to produce
evidence or give testimony pursuant to procedures of that state;

(3) Order that an evaluation or assessment be made of
the respondent;

(4) Order any appropriate investigation of a person
involved in a proceeding;

(5) Forward to the court of the State of Hawaii a
certified copy of the transcript or other record of a hearing under paragraph
(1) or any other proceeding, any evidence otherwise produced under paragraph
(2), and any evaluation or assessment prepared in compliance with an order
under paragraph (3) or (4);

(6) Issue any order necessary to assure the
appearance in the proceeding of a person whose presence is necessary for the
court to make a determination, including the respondent or the incapacitated or
protected person; or

(7) Issue an order authorizing the release of
medical, financial, criminal, or other relevant information in that state,
including protected health information as defined in 45 Code of Federal
Regulations section 160.103, as amended.

(b) If a court of another state in which a
guardianship or protective proceeding is pending requests assistance of the
kind provided in subsection (a), a court of the State of Hawaii has
jurisdiction for the limited purpose of granting the request or making reasonable
efforts to comply with the request. [L 2012, c 236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next